Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. Jurisdiction of Probate Division of the Superior Court

§ 2601.
Repealed.
1985, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 163.

§ 2602.
Court appointing, to have jurisdiction; accounts.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court by which a guardian is appointed shall have jurisdiction of the estate of the ward and shall alone be authorized to license the sale of the estate and settle the guardian’s account.
In accordance with the Rules of Probate Procedure, a guardian shall annually account to the court for the proceeds and expenditures of the ward’s estate, together with an account of the guardian’s fees.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 117;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2603.
Nonresident guardian.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall not appoint a guardian who is not domiciled in this State at the time of appointment, except where the guardian is named in a will or is a relative of the ward and in that case the same shall be discretionary with the court. The Probate Division of the Superior Court may remove a guardian who ceases to be domiciled in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 1968;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 118;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.